Idaho, session 2025, H0353.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-351, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-351. COST-SHARING REQUIREMENTS FOR HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS. (1) As
used in this section, "cost-sharing requirement" means any copayment, coin-
surance, deductible, or annual limitation on cost-sharing required by a
health benefit plan for a specific health care service covered by the health
benefit plan.
(2) When calculating an enrollee's contribution to any applicable
cost-sharing requirement for a covered prescription drug, an insurer shall
include any cost-sharing amounts paid:
(a) By the enrollee; or
(b) On behalf of the enrollee by another party.
(3) If a manufacturer pays an amount on behalf of an enrollee or pro-
vides other financial assistance for a covered prescription drug, such manu-
facturer:
(a) Shall provide the full value of the assistance to the enrollee until
the enrollee meets the enrollee's cost-sharing requirements, and to the
enrollee's health benefit plan thereafter;
(b) May not discontinue a coupon during the calendar year;
(c) Shall notify an enrollee prior to October 1 if financial assistance
will be discontinued in the subsequent calendar year;
(d) Shall provide assistance to an individual without health insurance
coverage on terms no less favorable than those offered to an insured in-
dividual;
(e) May not adjust the amount of assistance it provides to an enrollee
if the enrollee's health benefit plan eliminates the enrollee's cost-
sharing requirements when payments are made on an enrollee's behalf for
a qualified prescription drug; and
(f) May not provide assistance in the form of a post-claim reimburse-
ment to an enrollee.
(4) On or before August 1, 2027, and on or before August 1 of each year
thereafter, a manufacturer shall report to the department of insurance the
following information for the preceding calendar year for each prescription
drug for which assistance, including a discount, rebate, product voucher, or
other reduction intended to lower an insured's cost-sharing, is offered:


(a) The number of patients in the state who received assistance;
(b) The total value of such assistance;
(c) The terms and conditions to qualify for assistance and how the eli-
gibility is verified for accuracy; and
(d) The total sales of the prescription drug in the state, based on the
wholesale acquisition cost of the prescription drug.
(5) This section applies to any health benefit plan entered into,
amended, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, and applies to a
qualified high-deductible health plan only after an enrollee satisfies the
deductible of such plan.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a prescription
drug if:
(a) There is a medically appropriate generic equivalent or biosimilar
prescription drug that is covered under the health benefit plan; and
(b) The patient's doctor has indicated that the medically appropriate
generic equivalent or biosimilar prescription drug is appropriate for
the patient.
(7) The department of insurance may promulgate rules, subject to leg-
islative approval, to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2027.